Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.747

Effectiveness and efficiency of the Washington small business retirement marketplace—Biennial report.

The director shall report biennially to the legislature on the effectiveness and efficiency of the Washington small business retirement marketplace, including the levels of enrollment and the retirement savings levels of participating enrollees that are obtained in aggregate on a voluntary basis from private sector financial services firms that participate in the marketplace.

[ 2015 c 296 s 8.]